Texas statutes.
INSURANCE CODE

TITLE 13. REGULATION OF PROFESSIONALS

SUBTITLE A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

CHAPTER 4003. LICENSE EXPIRATION AND RENEWAL

Sec. 4003.001. LICENSE EXPIRATION. (a) Unless a staggered renewal system is adopted under Section 4003.002, each license issued or renewed by the department under Chapter 981 or Subtitle A, B, or C and not suspended or revoked by the commissioner expires on:

(1) the second anniversary of the date the license is issued to or renewed by a person that is not an individual; or

(2) except as provided in Subsection (c):

(A) for a license issued or renewed in an even-numbered year, the individual license holder's birthday each even-numbered year; or

(B) for a license issued or renewed in an odd-numbered year, the individual license holder's birthday each odd-numbered year.

(b) The commissioner by rule may change the two-year expiration period if the commissioner determines that the change is necessary to promote uniformity of license periods of this state with those of other states.

(c) If a person holds more than one license, all licenses issued to the person expire on the earliest expiration date of the licenses held. Thereafter, all licenses expire in accordance with Subsection (a).

(d) Notwithstanding Section 4003.002(b), the commissioner may not prorate the initial application fee for a license based on the expiration period of the license under Subsection (c).

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1274, Sec. 7, eff. April 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1172 (S.B. 876), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 4003.002. STAGGERED RENEWAL SYSTEM. (a) The commissioner by rule may adopt a system under which licenses expire on various dates during a licensing period.

(b) For the licensing period in which the license expiration is changed, license fees shall be prorated so that each license holder pays only that portion of the license fee allocable to the period during which the license is valid. On renewal of the license on the new expiration date, the total renewal fee is payable.

(c) The commissioner shall adopt a system under which a person who holds more than one license may renew all the licenses held in a single process.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1274, Sec. 7, eff. April 1, 2005.

Sec. 4003.003. NOTICE OF LICENSE EXPIRATION. Not later than the 30th day before the date a person's license expires, the department shall send written notice of the impending license expiration to the person at the person's last known mailing address according to the department's records.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1274, Sec. 7, eff. April 1, 2005.

Sec. 4003.004. PROCEDURE FOR RENEWAL OF LICENSE. (a) A person may renew an unexpired license by:

(1) filing a properly completed renewal application with the department in the form prescribed by the department; and

(2) paying to the department the required renewal fee in an amount set by the department.

(b) A person may not renew a license that has been suspended or revoked.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1274, Sec. 7, eff. April 1, 2005.

Sec. 4003.005. RENEWAL FEE NONREFUNDABLE. A renewal fee paid under this chapter is nonrefundable.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1274, Sec. 7, eff. April 1, 2005.

Sec. 4003.006. CONTINUATION OF ORIGINAL LICENSE. The original license of a person who has applied for license renewal in compliance with Section 4003.004 remains in effect from the date the renewal application is filed until the date:

(1) the department issues the renewal license;

(2) the license is not renewed under Section 4004.055; or

(3) the commissioner issues an order revoking the license.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1274, Sec. 7, eff. April 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1172 (S.B. 876), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 4003.007. RENEWAL OF EXPIRED LICENSE. (a) A person whose license has been expired for 90 days or less may renew the license by:

(1) filing a renewal application with the department in the form prescribed by the department; and

(2) paying to the department:

(A) the required renewal fee; and

(B) an additional fee equal to one-half of the required renewal fee.

(b) A person whose license has been expired for more than 90 days but less than one year may not renew the license. The person may obtain a new license without taking the applicable examination by:

(1) filing a new application with the department; and

(2) paying to the department:

(A) the license fee; and

(B) an additional fee equal to one-half of the license fee.

(c) A person whose license has been expired for one year or more may not renew the license. The person may obtain a new license by:

(1) submitting to reexamination, if examination is required for original issuance of the license; and

(2) complying with the other requirements and procedures for obtaining an original license.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1274, Sec. 7, eff. April 1, 2005.

Sec. 4003.008. RENEWAL OF EXPIRED LICENSE BY OUT-OF-STATE AGENT. (a) The department may renew without reexamination an expired license of a person who was licensed in this state, moved to another state, and is currently licensed and has been in continual practice in the other state preceding the date of the application.

(b) The person must pay to the department a fee equal to the license application fee.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1274, Sec. 7, eff. April 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1172 (S.B. 876), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 4003.009. INTERSTATE MOVE BY AGENT. (a) Not later than the 30th day after moving from one state to another state, an agent licensed in this state shall file with the department:

(1) the agent's new address; and

(2) proof of authorization to engage in the business of insurance in the new state of residence.

(b) The department may not charge a fee or require a license application under this section.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1274, Sec. 7, eff. April 1, 2005.

Sec. 4003.010. CHAPTER NOT APPLICABLE TO THIRD-PARTY ADMINISTRATORS. This chapter does not apply to a certificate of authority issued under Chapter 4151.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1274, Sec. 7, eff. April 1, 2005.